New York, session 2025-2026, S4542.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 58 of the civil 2 service law, including the age requirements under paragraph (a) of 3 subdivision 1 of such section, or any other provision of law to the 4 contrary, Justin Finkle, who is a resident of the county of Albany, 5 shall be eligible to take the competitive civil service examination for 6 the position of police officer and shall, contingent upon his score on 7 such examination, be eligible to be placed on the eligible list for 8 appointment as a full-time police officer with the Albany county sher- 9 iff's office. 10 § 2. Justin Finkle shall otherwise be subject to the merit and fitness 11 provisions of the civil service law applicable to full-time police offi- 12 cers. 13 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00026-02-5